Kentucky statutes. TITLE XII Conservation and State Development
Organization

154.12-201.
Office of Business and Technology — Office of Industrial Development. [Repealed.]

154.12-202.
Kentucky Recycling Brokerage Authority — Powers — Duties — Brokerage fee — Reports. [Repealed, reenacted, and amended.]

154.12-203.
Kentucky Commission on Military Affairs — Purposes — Powers — Executive committee — Executive director.

There is created the Kentucky Commission on Military Affairs. The commission shall be a separate administrative body of state government within the meaning of KRS Chapter 12.

It shall be the purpose of the Kentucky Commission on Military Affairs to:

Address matters of military significance to Kentucky;

Maintain a cooperative and constructive relationship between state agencies and the military entities in Kentucky, as necessary to ensure coordination and implementation of unified, comprehensive, statewide strategies involved with, or affected by, the military;

Advise the Governor, the General Assembly, the Kentucky congressional delegation, and other appropriate government officials on all matters in which the military services and the Commonwealth have mutual interests, needs, and concerns;

Take action to promote and optimize state and Department of Defense initiatives that will improve the military value of Kentucky’s National Guard, active, and reserve military force structure and installations, and improve the quality of life for military personnel residing in the Commonwealth;

Coordinate, as necessary, the state’s interest in future Department of Defense base closure and restructuring activities;

Recommend state, federal, and local economic development projects which would promote, foster, and support economic progress through military presence in the Commonwealth;

Promote and assist the private sector in developing spin-off investments, employment, and educational opportunities associated with high-technology programs and activities at Kentucky’s military installations;

Recommend to the Kentucky Economic Development Partnership the long-range options and potential for the defense facilities located in Kentucky;

Develop strategies to encourage military personnel to retire and relocate in Kentucky and promote those leaving the military as a viable quality workforce for economic development and industrial recruitment; and

Allocate available grant money to qualified applicants to further the purposes of paragraphs (a) to (i) of this subsection.

The Kentucky Commission on Military Affairs shall consist of:

The Governor or a designated representative;

The secretary of the Cabinet for Economic Development or a designated representative;

The adjutant general of the Commonwealth or a designated representative;

The executive director of the Office of Homeland Security or a designated representative;

The secretaries of the following cabinets or their designees:

Finance and Administration;

Justice and Public Safety;

Energy and Environment;

Transportation;

Education and Workforce Development;

Health and Family Services;

Personnel;

Labor;

Public Protection; and

Tourism, Arts and Heritage;

The Attorney General or a designated representative;

The commissioner of the Department of Veterans’ Affairs or a designated representative;

The executive director of the Kentucky Commission on Military Affairs or a designated representative;

The chairperson of the Kentucky Committee for Employer Support of the Guard and Reserve;

Kentucky’s Civilian Aides to the Secretary of the United States Army;

The chairperson of the Senate Veterans, Military Affairs, and Public Protection Committee and the chairperson of the House of Representatives Veterans, Military Affairs, and Public Safety Committee;

The Chief Justice or a designated representative;

The commander or the designee of the commander of each of the following as nonvoting, ex officio members:

U.S. Army Cadet Command;

U.S. Army Human Resources Command;

U.S. Army Recruiting Command;

84th Training Command;

One Hundredth Division (Institutional Training);

101st Airborne Division;

Blue Grass Army Depot;

Fort Campbell Garrison;

Fort Knox Garrison;

11th Theatre Aviation Command, U.S. Army Reserve;

U.S. Army Corps of Engineers, Louisville District;

Adjutant General of the U.S. Army;

U.S. Coast Guard Sector Ohio Valley;

First Army Division East;

1st Theater Sustainment Command; and

Fifth (V) Corps; and

Five (5) at-large members appointed by the Governor, who shall be residents of counties significantly impacted by military installations.

The terms of the five (5) at-large members shall be staggered so that two (2) appointments shall expire at two (2) years, one (1) appointment shall expire at three (3) years, and two (2) appointments shall expire at four (4) years, from the dates of initial appointment.

The commission shall establish an executive committee consisting of the secretary of the Cabinet for Economic Development, the adjutant general of the Commonwealth, the commissioner of the Department of Veterans’ Affairs, the executive director of the Kentucky Commission on Military Affairs, and the five (5) at-large members. The chair and vice chair of the Kentucky Commission on Military Affairs shall be appointed by the Governor from among the members of the executive committee.
(5) (a)

The commission shall establish an executive committee consisting of the secretary of the Cabinet for Economic Development, the adjutant general of the Commonwealth, the commissioner of the Department of Veterans’ Affairs, the executive director of the Kentucky Commission on Military Affairs, and the five (5) at-large members. The chair and vice chair of the Kentucky Commission on Military Affairs shall be appointed by the Governor from among the members of the executive committee.

The chair and vice chair of the commission shall also serve as chair and vice chair of the executive committee.

The executive committee shall serve as the search committee for an executive director of the commission and shall have any other authority the commission delegates to it.

The commission shall meet one (1) time each year, and may meet at other times on call of the chair, to establish the commission’s goals and to review issues identified and recommendations made by the executive committee. A majority of the members shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of the commission’s business. Members’ designees shall have voting privileges at commission meetings.

Members of the commission shall serve without compensation, but shall be reimbursed for their necessary travel expenses actually incurred in the discharge of their duties on the commission, subject to Finance and Administration Cabinet administrative regulations.

The commission may establish committees or work groups composed of commission members and citizens as necessary to advise the commission in carrying out its responsibilities, duties, and powers. Citizen members of committees or work groups shall not have a vote.

The commission may promulgate necessary administrative regulations as prescribed by KRS Chapter 13A.

The commission may adopt bylaws and operating policies necessary for its efficient and effective operation.

There shall be an executive director, who shall be the administrative head and chief executive officer of the commission, recommended by the executive committee, approved by the commission, and appointed by the Governor. The executive director shall have authority to hire staff, contract for services, expend funds, and operate the normal business activities of the commission.

The Kentucky Commission on Military Affairs and its executive committee shall be an independent agency attached to the Office of the Governor.

History.
Enact. Acts 1992, ch. 176, § 1, effective July 14, 1992; 1994, ch. 486, § 24, effective July 15, 1994; 1996, ch. 113, § 3, effective July 15, 1996; 1998, ch. 199, § 1, effective March 27, 1998; 1998, ch. 426, § 108, effective July 15, 1998; 2000, ch. 228, § 1, effective July 14, 2000; 2005, ch. 33, § 1, effective June 20, 2005; 2005, ch. 99, § 22, effective June 20, 2005; 2006, ch. 211, § 63, effective July 12, 2006; 2010, ch. 16, § 1, effective July 15, 2010; 2010, ch. 24, § 194, effective July 15, 2010; 2011, ch. 11, § 1, effective June 8, 2011; 2014, ch. 57, § 1, effective July 15, 2014; 2015 ch. 93, § 1, effective June 24, 2015; 2020 ch. 43, § 1, effective July 15, 2020.

154.12-2033.
Eligibility of endorsed capital construction projects for state economic development incentives.

Any capital construction project endorsed by the Kentucky Commission on Military Affairs as preserving or creating jobs at military facilities located in Kentucky shall be eligible for state economic development incentives prescribed in this chapter, including but not limited to those provided in KRS 154.22-010 to 154.22-070, KRS 154.24-010 to 154.24-150, KRS 154.26-010 to 154.26-100, KRS 154.28-010 to 154.28-090 and KRS 141.400, and KRS 154.33-501 to 154.33-585; however, no project shall receive state financial assistance unless first approved by the Kentucky Economic Development Finance Authority. No project shall be located on federally owned or leased property.

All standards, procedures, and requirements applicable to projects approved by the Kentucky Economic Development Finance Authority for state economic development incentives pursuant to the provisions of this chapter shall be applicable to all economic development projects submitted by the commission and approved by the authority for assistance.

Notwithstanding any laws of the Commonwealth to the contrary, costs of highway and other transportation related construction and other infrastructure facilities improvements associated with a project endorsed by the commission may be eligible for state funding under programs administered by the Transportation Cabinet and the Kentucky Infrastructure Authority.

History.
Enact. Acts 1996, ch. 113, § 5, effective July 15, 1996.

154.12-2035.
Electronic database of approved program projects — Annual report — Programs included — Coordination with other agencies.

The cabinet shall maintain a searchable electronic database on its Web site containing information on the cost and status of the programs listed in subsection (3)(a) of this section. The database shall include all projects approved at any time in the last five (5) years and shall include for each, where applicable, the following information:

The name of the program, the recipient or participant, the type of project, and its location by county;

Total and approved costs of the project or investment, and the amount of incentives or other benefits authorized;

For the Kentucky Business Investment Program and the Kentucky Enterprise Initiative Act, the amount of incentives or other benefits actually recovered as self-reported by the recipient;

The number of new jobs estimated and, for the Kentucky Business Investment Program, actually created, along with wage information for those jobs;

Project status and the date and nature of the most recent activity; and

Any other comparable data or information necessary to achieve transparency and accountability for the specified programs.

In addition to the electronic database required in subsection (1) of this section, the cabinet shall prepare an annual report on the programs listed in subsection (3) of this section and make it available on the Cabinet for Economic Development Web site by November 1 of each year. The report shall include all projects approved in the preceding fiscal year and shall provide for these projects the information specified in subsection (1) of this section plus aggregate data for each program, summary evaluations of program activity and effectiveness, and anything required by statute to be reported for any particular program. The report shall also list all projects that were approved in prior years but active at any time in the preceding fiscal year, although for these projects the report need not provide further data.

The following programs shall be subject to the reporting requirements of this section:

The electronic database required in subsection (1) of this section shall include the Bluegrass State Skills Corporation, grants-in-aid and skills training investment credit; Kentucky Business Investment Program; Kentucky Enterprise Initiative Act; Office of Entrepreneurship and Small Business Innovation programs; Incentives for Energy-related Business Act; Kentucky Economic Development Finance Authority small business and direct loan programs; Kentucky Industrial Revitalization Act; Kentucky Reinvestment Act; Kentucky Small Business Tax Credit; economic development bonds; Kentucky Industrial Development Act; Kentucky Jobs Development Act; Kentucky Jobs Retention Act; the Kentucky Rural Economic Development Act; and

The annual report required by subsection (2) of this section shall include all programs listed in paragraph (a) of this subsection plus the Kentucky Investment Fund Act, and tax increment financing, state participation projects.

The cabinet shall coordinate with any other agency necessary to supply the information required by this section.

HISTORY:
Enact. Acts 2014, ch. 134, § 1, effective July 15, 2014; 2018 ch. 199, § 18, effective July 14, 2018; 2021 ch. 185, § 108, effective June 29, 2021; 2021 ch. 141, § 5, effective July 1, 2021.

154.12-204.
Definitions for KRS 154.12-205 to 154.12-208.

As used in KRS 154.12-205 to 154.12-208, unless the context requires otherwise:

“Agribusiness” has the same meaning as in KRS 154.32-010;

“Alternative fuel production” has the same meaning as in KRS 154.32-010;

“Applicant” means a business or industry that has made application for a grant-in-aid or skills training investment credit as authorized by KRS 154.12-205 to 154.12-208;

“Approved company” means any qualified company seeking to sponsor an occupational upgrade training program or skills upgrade training program for the benefit of one (1) or more of its employees, which is approved by the corporation to receive grant-in-aid or skills training investment credits as provided by KRS 154.12-205 to 154.12-208;

“Approved costs” means costs confirmed as eligible by the corporation, including:

Fees or salaries required to be paid to instructors who are employees of the approved company, instructors who are full-time, part-time, or adjunct instructors with an educational institution, and instructors who are consultants on contract with an approved company in connection with an occupational upgrade training program or skills upgrade training program sponsored by an approved company;

The cost of supplies and materials used exclusively in an occupational upgrade training program or skills upgrade training program sponsored by an approved company;

Employee wages to be paid in connection with an occupational upgrade training program or skills upgrade training program sponsored by an approved company; and

All other costs of a nature comparable to those described in this subsection;

“Board” means the board of directors of the Bluegrass State Skills Corporation;

“Carbon dioxide transmission pipeline” has the same meaning as in KRS 154.32-010;

“Coal severing and processing” has the same meaning as in KRS 154.32-010;

“Corporation” means the Bluegrass State Skills Corporation, or BSSC;

“Educational institution” means a public or nonpublic secondary or postsecondary institution or an independent provider within the Commonwealth authorized by law to provide a program of skills training or education beyond the secondary school level or to adult persons without a high school diploma or its equivalent;

“Employee” means any person:

Who is currently a permanent full-time employee of the qualified company;

Who is a resident of Kentucky, as that term is defined in KRS 141.010; and

Who is paid the minimum base hourly wage plus employee benefits equal to or greater than fifteen percent (15%) of the minimum base hourly wage. If the qualified company does not provide employee benefits equal to at least fifteen percent (15%) of the minimum base hourly wage, the qualified company may still qualify if it provides the full-time employee total hourly compensation equal to or greater than one hundred fifteen percent (115%) of the minimum base hourly wage through increased hourly wages combined with at least one (1) company-paid employee benefit;

“Energy-efficient alternative fuel production” has the same meaning as in KRS 154.32-010;

“Gasification production” has the same meaning as in KRS 154.32-010;

“Grant-in-aid” means funding that is provided to qualified companies by the BSSC for the development or expansion of a program as provided in this chapter;

“Headquarters” has the same meaning as in KRS 154.32-010;

“Hospital” has the same meaning as in KRS 154.32-010;

“Manufacturing” has the same meaning as in KRS 154.32-010;

“Minimum base hourly wage” means the minimum wage amount paid to an employee by a qualified company, which shall not be less than one hundred fifty percent (150%) of the federal minimum wage;

“Nonretail service or technology” means the same as in KRS 154.32-010;

“Occupational upgrade training” means employee training sponsored by a qualified company that is designed to qualify the employee for a promotional opportunity with the qualified company;

“Program” or “program of skills training or education consistent with employment needs” means a coordinated course of instruction which is designed to prepare individuals for employment in a specific trade, occupation, or profession. Such instruction may include:

Classroom instruction;

Classroom-related field, shop, factory, office, or laboratory work; and

Basic skills, entry level training, job upgrading, retraining, and advance training;

“Qualified company” means any corporation, limited liability company, partnership, limited partnership, sole proprietorship, business trust, or any other legal entity through which business is conducted that is engaged in or is planning to be engaged in one (1) or more of the following activities within the Commonwealth:
(22) (a)

“Qualified company” means any corporation, limited liability company, partnership, limited partnership, sole proprietorship, business trust, or any other legal entity through which business is conducted that is engaged in or is planning to be engaged in one (1) or more of the following activities within the Commonwealth:

Manufacturing;

Agribusiness;

Nonretail service or technology;

Headquarter operations, regardless of the underlying business activity of the company;

Alternative fuel, gasification, energy-efficient alternative fuel, or renewable energy production;

Carbon dioxide transmission pipeline;

Coal severing and processing; or

Hospital operations.

“Qualified company” does not include companies where the primary activity to be conducted within the Commonwealth is forestry, fishing, the provision of utilities, construction, wholesale trade, retail trade, real estate, rental and leasing, accommodation and food services, or public administration services;

“Renewable energy production” means the same as in KRS 154.32-010;

“Skills upgrade training” means employee training sponsored by a qualified company that is designed to provide the employee with new skills necessary to enhance productivity, improve performance, or retain employment, including but not limited to technical and interpersonal skills, and training that is designed to enhance computer skills, communication skills, problem solving, reading, writing, or math skills of employees who are unable to function effectively on the job due to deficiencies in these areas, are unable to advance on the job, or who risk displacement because their skill deficiencies inhibit their training potential for new technology;

“Skills training investment credit” means the credit against Kentucky income tax imposed by KRS 141.020 or 141.040, and the limited liability entity tax imposed by KRS 141.0401, as provided in this subchapter; and

“Technical assistance” means professional and any other assistance provided by qualified companies to an educational institution, which is reasonably calculated to support directly the development and expansion of a particular program as defined herein.

HISTORY:
Enact. Acts 1984, ch. 211, § 1, effective July 13, 1984, repealed and reenact. Acts 1990, ch. 476, Pt. V, § 391, effective July 13, 1990; repealed and reenact. Acts 1990, ch. 476, Pt. V, § 391, effective July 13, 1990; 1996, ch. 194, § 17, effective July 15, 1996; 2000, ch. 300, § 5, effective July 14, 2000; 2000, ch. 526, § 13, effective July 14, 2000; 2006, ch. 149, § 209, effective July 12, 2006; 2018 ch. 199, § 11, effective July 14, 2018; 2021 ch. 185, § 102, effective June 29, 2021.

154.12-205.
Bluegrass State Skills Corporation — Board.

There is hereby created an independent, de jure corporation of the Commonwealth with all the general corporate powers incidental thereto which shall be known as the “Bluegrass State Skills Corporation.” The corporation shall be a political subdivision of the state and shall be attached to the Cabinet for Economic Development.

The corporation is created and established to improve and promote the employment opportunities of the citizens of the Commonwealth by creating and expanding programs of skills training and education which meet the needs of qualified companies.

The corporation shall be governed by a board of directors consisting of eighteen (18) members, including the following six (6) ex officio members: the commissioner of the Department of Workforce Investment or his or her designee, the secretary of the Cabinet for Economic Development, the secretary of the Labor Cabinet, the president of the Council on Postsecondary Education, the secretary of the Education and Workforce Development Cabinet, and the president of the Kentucky Community and Technical College System. The twelve (12) other members shall be appointed by the Governor, including persons having knowledge and experience in business and industry, skills training, education, and minority employment; and at least one (1) of the twelve (12) members shall be appointed to represent labor organizations. Each member appointed by the Governor shall serve for a term of four (4) years, except that in making the initial appointments, the Governor shall appoint three (3) members to serve for one (1) year, three (3) members to serve for two (2) years, three (3) members to serve for three (3) years, and three (3) members to serve for four (4) years. All succeeding appointments shall be for a term of four (4) years.

In the event of a vacancy, the Governor may appoint a replacement member who shall hold office during the remainder of the term so vacated.

Any member may be removed from his appointment by the Governor for cause.

The Governor shall designate a member of the board as its chairman.

Members of the board of directors of the corporation, except for ex officio members, shall be entitled to compensation for their services in the amount of one hundred dollars ($100) for each regular or special called meeting of the corporation, and all members shall be entitled to reimbursement for any actual and necessary expenses incurred in the performance of their duties.

The board of directors of the corporation shall annually elect a vice chairman, a secretary, and a treasurer. The secretary shall keep a record of the proceedings of the corporation and shall be custodian of all books, documents, and papers filed with the corporation, and its official seal.

The Cabinet for Economic Development shall provide staff and support services to the corporation and shall direct and supervise its administrative affairs and general management subject to the policies, control, and direction of the board.

All officers and employees of the corporation having access to its funding shall give bond to the corporation, at its expense, in the amount and with the surety as the board may prescribe.

HISTORY:
Enact. Acts 1984, ch. 211, § 2, effective July 13, 1984; 1988, ch. 199, § 1, effective July 15, 1988; 1988, ch. 205, § 8, effective July 15, 1988; 1990, ch. 476, Pt. IV, § 195, effective July 13, 1990; 1992, ch. 105, § 52, effective July 14, 1992; 1992, ch. 417, § 10, effective July 14, 1992; 1996, ch. 194, § 18, effective July 15, 1996; 1997 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 55, effective May 30, 1997; 2006, ch. 211, § 64, effective July 12, 2006; 2009, ch. 11, § 32, effective June 25, 2009; 2010, ch. 24, § 195, effective July 15, 2010; 2018 ch. 199, § 12, effective July 14, 2018.

154.12-206.
Duties of corporation.

The corporation shall have all of the powers necessary or convenient to carry out and effectuate the purposes and provisions of this chapter, including, but not limited to the following:

To adopt bylaws for the regulation of its affairs and the conduct of its business and to prescribe rules, regulations, and policies in connection with the performance of its function and duties;

To adopt an official seal;

To sue and be sued in its own name;

To make contracts and execute all instruments necessary or convenient for the conduct of its business;

To make, execute, and effectuate all agreements with any federal or state agency or any person, corporation, association, partnership, or other organization or entity necessary to accomplish the purposes of this chapter;

To procure sufficient insurance coverage against any losses in connection with its property;

To accept any and all donations, grants, bequests, and devices, conditional or otherwise, of money, property, service, or other things of value which may be received from the United States, or any agency thereof, any governmental agency, an institution, person, firm, or corporation, public and private, to be held, used, or applied solely for the purposes specified in KRS 154.12-204 to 154.12-208. Receipt of each donation or grant shall be detailed in the annual report of the corporation. Such reports shall include the identity of the donor and the nature of the transaction;

To collect and disseminate to interested individuals, in cooperation with and through any agencies of federal, state, and municipal government, information concerning areas of present and projected employment need, programs of skills training and education consistent therewith, and any other relevant information;

To provide grants-in-aid to educational institutions and approved companies to encourage and facilitate the formation of comprehensive cooperative relationships between the public and private sectors which secure for such institutions the information, technical assistance, and financial support necessary for the development and significant expansion of programs of skills training and education consistent with employment need;

To prepare, publish, and distribute, with or without charge as the corporation may determine, such technical studies, reports, bulletins, and other materials as it deems appropriate; and

To organize, conduct, or sponsor special institutes, conferences, demonstrations, and studies to effectuate the purposes of KRS 154.12-204 to 154.12-208.

HISTORY:
Enact. Acts 1984, ch. 211, § 3, effective July 13, 1984; repealed and reenact., Acts 1990, ch. 476, Pt. V, § 392, effective July 13, 1990; 1996, ch. 194, § 19, effective July 15, 1996; 2018 ch. 199, § 13, effective July 14, 2018; 2021 ch. 185, § 103, effective June 29, 2021.

154.12-207.
Grant-in-aid — Skills training investment credit — Application — Approval — Maximum amount — Training.

The corporation may, subject to appropriation from the General Assembly or from funds made available to the corporation from any other public or private source, provide grants-in-aid to qualified companies, not in excess of two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000) per grant-in-aid. Such grants-in-aid shall be used exclusively for programs which are consistent with the provisions of this chapter.

The corporation may, in accordance with KRS 154.12-204 to 154.12-208, award a skills training investment credit to an approved company. The amount of the skills training investment credit awarded by the corporation shall be an amount not to exceed fifty percent (50%) of the amount of approved costs incurred by the approved company in connection with its program of occupational upgrade training or skills upgrade training, the credit amount not to exceed two thousand dollars ($2,000) per trainee and, in the aggregate, not to exceed two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000) for each approved company per fiscal year. The corporation shall only approve one (1) application per fiscal year for each approved company.

To apply for a grant-in-aid or a skills training investment credit, a qualified company shall submit an application to the Bluegrass State Skills Corporation before commencing its program of skills upgrade or occupational upgrade training. Each application shall contain information the corporation requires, including but not limited to:

A proposal for a program of skills upgrade training, occupational upgrade training, and education;

A description of each component of the proposed training program and the number of employee training hours requested; and

A statement of the total anticipated costs and expenses of the program, including a breakdown of the costs associated with equipment, personnel, facilities, and materials.

Approval of the grant-in-aid and skills training investment credit application by the board shall be based upon the following criteria:

The program must be within the scope of KRS 154.12-204 to 154.12-208;

Participants in the program must qualify as an employee as defined by KRS 154.12-204;

The program must involve an area of skills upgrade training, occupational upgrade training, and education which is needed by a qualified company and for which a shortage of qualified individuals exists within the Commonwealth; and

The grant-in-aid and skills training investment credit must be essential to the success of the program as the resources are inadequate to attract the technical assistance and financial support necessary from a qualified company.

After a review of applications for grant-in-aid and skills training investment credits, the corporation may designate the qualified company as an approved company and approve the maximum amount of grants and skills training investment credits the approved company is eligible to receive. The maximum amount of skills training investment credits approved for all qualified companies by the corporation shall not exceed two million five hundred thousand dollars ($2,500,000) for each fiscal year. Skills training investment credits that remain unallocated by the corporation at the end of its fiscal year shall lapse and shall not be carried forward to a new fiscal year.

The approved company shall complete all programs of skills upgrade training or occupational upgrade training within one (1) year from the date of approval by the corporation and shall certify the completion of these programs to the corporation. Once they are completed and certified and all required documentation is provided and received by the corporation, the corporation shall disburse the grant funds or notify the approved company of the final authorized skills training investment credit.

HISTORY:
Enact. Acts 1984, ch. 211, § 4, effective July 13, 1984; repealed and reenact., Acts 1990, ch. 476, Pt. V, § 393, effective July 13, 1990; 1996, ch. 194, § 20, effective July 15, 1996; 2000, ch. 300, § 6, effective July 14, 2000; 2000, ch. 466, § 1, effective April 21, 2000; 2002, ch. 65, § 2, effective July 15, 2002; 2006, ch. 211, § 65, effective July 12, 2006; 2009, ch. 11, § 33, effective June 25, 2009; 2018 ch. 199, § 14, effective July 14, 2018; 2021 ch. 185, § 104, effective June 29, 2021.

154.12-208.
Annual report.

By November 1 of each year, the corporation shall prepare an annual report of its activities and make it available on the Cabinet for Economic Development Web page as required in KRS 154.12-2035. The annual report shall include, but not be limited to, descriptions of all programs funded, an evaluation of the performance of each program, a summary of expenditures, and a detailed description of the participants.

HISTORY:
Enact. Acts 1984, ch. 211, § 5, effective July 13, 1984; 1988, ch. 437, Pt. XI, §
1, effective April 15, 1988; repealed and reenact., Acts 1990, ch. 476, Pt. V, § 394, effective July 13, 1990; 1996, ch. 194, § 21, effective July 15, 1996; 2014, ch. 134, § 5, effective July 15, 2014; 2018 ch. 199, § 15, effective July 14, 2018.

154.12-2084.
Definitions for KRS 154.12-2084 to 154.12-2089.

As used in KRS 154.12-2084 to 154.12-2089, unless the context requires otherwise:

“Approved company” means any qualified company seeking to sponsor an occupational upgrade training program or skills upgrade training program for the benefit of one (1) or more of its employees, which is approved by the authority to receive skills training investment credits in accordance with KRS 154.12-2084 to 154.12-2089;

“Approved costs” means:

Fees or salaries required to be paid to instructors who are employees of the approved company, instructors who are full-time, part-time, or adjunct instructors with an educational institution, and instructors who are consultants on contract with an approved company in connection with an occupational upgrade training program or skills upgrade training program sponsored by an approved company;

Administrative fees charged by educational institutions in connection with an occupational upgrade training program or skills upgrade training program sponsored by an approved company and specifically approved by the Bluegrass State Skills Corporation;

The cost of supplies, materials, and equipment used exclusively in an occupational upgrade training program or skills upgrade training program sponsored by an approved company;

The cost of leasing a training facility where space is unavailable at an educational institution or at the premises of an approved company in connection with an occupational upgrade training program or skills upgrade training program sponsored by an approved company;

Employee wages to be paid in connection with an occupational upgrade training program or skills upgrade training program sponsored by an approved company; and

All other costs of a nature comparable to those described in this subsection;

“Bluegrass State Skills Corporation” means the Bluegrass State Skills Corporation created by KRS 154.12-205;

“Commonwealth” means the Commonwealth of Kentucky;

“Educational institution” means a public or nonpublic secondary or postsecondary institution or an independent provider within the Commonwealth authorized by law to provide a program of skills training or education beyond the secondary school level or to adult persons without a high school diploma or its equivalent;

“Employee” means any person:

Who is currently a permanent full-time employee of the qualified company;

Who has been employed by the qualified company for the last twelve (12) calendar months immediately preceding the filing of the application for skills training investment credits by the qualified company;

Who is a Kentucky resident, as that term is defined in KRS 141.010; and

Who receives a base hourly wage which is one hundred fifty percent (150%) of the federal minimum wage plus employee benefits equal to at least fifteen percent (15%) of the applicable base hourly wage, if the qualified company is located in a county of Kentucky which has had an average countywide rate of unemployment of fifteen percent (15%) or greater in the most recent twelve (12) consecutive months for which unemployment figures are available, on the basis of the final unemployment figures calculated by the Department of Workforce Investment in the Education and Workforce Development Cabinet.

“Occupational upgrade training” means employee training sponsored by a qualified company that is designed to qualify the employee for a promotional opportunity with the qualified company;

“Preliminarily approved company” means a qualified company seeking to sponsor an occupational upgrade training program or skills upgrade training program, which has received preliminarily approval from the authority under KRS 154.12-2088 to receive a certain maximum amount of skills training investment credits;

“Qualified company” means any person, corporation, limited liability company, partnership, limited partnership, sole proprietorship, firm, enterprise, franchise, association, organization, holding company, joint stock company, professional service corporation, or any other legal entity through which business is conducted that has been actively engaged in any of the following qualified activities within the Commonwealth for not less than three (3) consecutive years: manufacturing, including the processing, assembling, production, or warehousing of any property; processing of agricultural and forestry products; telecommunications; health care; product research and engineering; tool and die and machine technology; mining; tourism and operation of facilities to be used in the entertainment, recreation, and convention industry; and transportation in support of manufacturing. Notwithstanding the provisions of this subsection, any company whose primary purpose is the sale of goods at retail shall not constitute a qualified company;

“Skills upgrade training” means employee training sponsored by a qualified company that is designed to provide the employee with new skills necessary to enhance productivity, improve performance, or retain employment, including but not limited to technical and interpersonal skills training, and training that is designed to enhance the computer skills, communication skills, problem solving, reading, writing, or math skills of employees who are unable to function effectively on the job due to deficiencies in these areas, are unable to advance on the job, or who risk displacement because their skill deficiencies inhibit their training potential for new technology; and

“Skills training investment credit” means the credit against Kentucky income tax imposed by KRS 141.020 or 141.040, and the limited liability entity tax imposed by KRS 141.0401, as provided in KRS 154.12-2086(1).

For purposes of this subsection, a “full-time employee” means an employee who has been employed by the qualified company for a minimum of thirty-five (35) hours per week for more than two hundred fifty (250) work days during the most recently ended calendar year and is subject to the tax imposed by KRS 141.020;

History.
Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 499, § 1, effective July 15, 1998; 2000, ch. 466, § 2, effective April 21, 2000; 2000, ch. 526, § 14, effective July 14, 2000; 2002, ch. 65, § 3, effective July 15, 2002; 2006, ch. 149, § 210, effective July 12, 2006; 2006, ch. 211, § 66, effective July 12, 2006; 2006 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 2, § 40, effective June 28, 2006; 2009, ch. 11, § 34, effective June 25, 2009; 2019 ch. 146, § 16, effective June 27, 2019.